Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.070

Meaning of terms in trust instrument.

The terms "legal investment" or "authorized investment" or words of similar import, as used in any such instrument, shall be taken to mean any investment which is permitted by the terms of RCW 11.100.020.

[ 1985 c 30 s 74. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 110; 1955 c 33 s 30.24.070; prior: 1947 c 100 s 7; 1941 c 41 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3255-13. Formerly RCW 30.24.070.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.